Tennessee, session 114, HB0061.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
In a complaint or referral made pursuant to this section, a subpoena may be
issued for a student's attendance record, including all previous school years that the
student attended a public school, in accordance with the Family Educational Rights and
Privacy Act (FERPA) (20 U.S.C. 1232g) and all other relevant privacy laws.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0061
000044
- 1 -